District of Columbia statutes.
31-5502

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to all kinds of direct insurance, but shall not be applicable to the following:

(1)

Life, annuity, health, or disability insurance;

(2)

Mortgage guaranty, financial guaranty, or other forms of insurance offering protection against investment risks;

(3)

Fidelity or surety bonds, or any other bonding obligations;

(4)

Credit insurance, vendors’ single interest insurance, or collateral protection insurance or any similar insurance protecting the interests of a creditor arising out of a creditor-debtor transaction;

(5)

Insurance of warranties or service contracts;

(6)

Title insurance;

(7)

Ocean marine insurance;

(8)

Any transaction or combination of transactions between a person, including affiliates of such a person, and an insurer, including affiliates of such an insurer, which involves the transfer of investment or credit risk unaccompanied by transfer of insurance risk; or

(9)

Any insurance provided by or guaranteed by government.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-51, § 3, 40 DCR 6120
This section is referenced in § 31-5501.
1981 Ed., § 35-3902.